Utah statutes.
63C-12-107.   Research team.

(1)  There is created a Snake Valley Aquifer Research Team composed of the following four members:

(a)  a representative of the Division of Air Quality, appointed by the executive director of the Department of Environmental Quality;

(b)  a representative of the Department of Agriculture and Food, appointed by the commissioner of the Department of Agriculture and Food;

(c)  the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources or the executive director's designee; and

(d)  the director of the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office.

(2)  The director of the Public Lands Policy Coordinating Office shall coordinate and direct the research team's data and information compilation and reporting required by Section 63C-12-108.



Enacted by Chapter 262, 2009 General Session

